Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-139
Greeley.

The county of Greeley is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township seventeen, north, of range twelve, west; thence east to the southeast corner of township seventeen, north, of range nine, west; thence north to the northeast corner of township twenty, north, of range nine, west; thence west to the northwest corner of township twenty, north, of range twelve, west; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 23, p. 216;

R.S.1913, § 852;

C.S.1922, § 754;

C.S.1929, § 25-141;

R.S.1943, § 22-139.